Arkansas, session 2025, SB237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-63-1601(3), concerning the definition of
"association" used in the licensing and regulation of captive insurers, is
amended to read as follows:
(3) "Association" means a legal association of individuals,
corporations, partnerships, or associations that has been in continuous
existence for at least one (1) year:
(A) The member organizations of which collectively, or
which does itself:
(i) Own, control, or hold with power to vote all of
the outstanding voting securities of an association captive insurance company
incorporated as a stock insurer; or
(ii) Have complete voting control over an
association captive insurance company incorporated as a mutual insurer; or
(B) The member organizations of which collectively
constitute all of the subscribers of an association captive insurance company
formed as a reciprocal insurer;
*ANS130*
02/14/2025 7:48:10 AM ANS130

SB237

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-63-1601(9), concerning the definition of
"Commissioner" used in the licensing and regulation of captive insurers, is
repealed.
(9) "Commissioner" means the Insurance Commissioner;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-63-1601(11), concerning the definition
of "Department" used in the licensing and regulation of captive insurers, is
repealed.
(11) "Department" means the State Insurance Department;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-63-1602, concerning the application for
a license as a captive insurer, is amended to add an additional subsection to
read as follows:
(f)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, the
commissioner may issue a provisional license to a captive insurance company
applying for a license under this subchapter if the commissioner finds that
issuing a provisional license is in the public's best interest.
(2) As a condition to the issuance of a provisional license
under subdivision (f)(1) of this section:
(A) The applicant shall have:
(i) Filed a complete application containing all
information required by this section; and
(ii) Paid all fees required for a license; and
(B) The commissioner shall have made a preliminary finding
that the expertise, experience, and character of the person who will control
and manage the applicant are acceptable.
(3) The commissioner may by order:
(A) Limit the authority of a provisional license in any
way deemed necessary to protect insureds and the public; or
(B) Revoke a provisional license if the interests of
insureds or the public are endangered.
(4) If an applicant fails to complete the regular licensure
application process under this section, the provisional license shall
automatically terminate.

02/14/2025 7:48:10 AM ANS130

SB237
SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 23-63-1604(a)(1), concerning the capital
requirements of a captive insurance company, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The Insurance Commissioner shall not issue a license to a
producer reinsurance captive insurance company, pure captive insurance
company, sponsored captive insurance company, association captive insurance
company incorporated as a stock insurer, or industrial insured captive
insurance company incorporated as a stock insurer unless the company
possesses and maintains unimpaired paid-in capital of:
(A) In the case of a producer reinsurance captive
insurance company, not less than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000);
(B) In the case of a pure captive insurance company, not
less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000);
(C) In the case of an association captive insurance
company incorporated as a stock insurer, not less than four hundred thousand
dollars ($400,000) two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000);
(D) In the case of an industrial insured captive insurance
company incorporated as a stock insurer, not less than two hundred thousand
dollars ($200,000) two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000);
(E) In the case of a sponsored captive insurance company,
not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000); or
(F) In the case of a special purpose captive insurance
company, an amount determined by the commissioner after giving due
consideration to the company's business plan, feasibility study, and pro
formas, including the nature of the risks to be insured, but in no event less
than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) one hundred twenty-five
thousand dollars ($125,000).

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 23-63-1604(d), concerning dividends and
distributions by a captive insurance company, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) A captive insurance company may not shall not pay a dividend
out of, or other distribution with respect to, capital or surplus, in excess
of the limitations set forth in § 23-63-515, without the prior approval of
the commissioner.
(2) Approval of an ongoing plan for the payment of dividends or
other distributions must shall be conditioned upon the retention, at the time
02/14/2025 7:48:10 AM ANS130

SB237
of each payment, of capital or surplus in excess of amounts specified by or
determined in accordance with according to formulas approved by the
commissioner.
(3) This subsection shall not does not apply to producer
reinsurance captive insurance companies.
(4)(A) A pure captive insurance company is not required to
obtain prior approval by the commissioner for payment of an ordinary
dividend.
(B) A pure captive insurance company shall obtain the
prior approval by the commissioner for an extraordinary dividend or
distribution as defined in § 23-63-515.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 23-63-1605(a)(1), concerning surplus
requirements for a captive insurance company, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The Insurance Commissioner shall not issue a license to a
captive insurance company unless the company possesses and maintains
unimpaired surplus of:
(A) In the case of a producer reinsurance captive
insurance company, not less than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000);
(B) In the case of a pure captive insurance company, not
less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000);
(C) In the case of an association captive insurance
company incorporated as a stock insurer, not less than three hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($350,000) two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000);
(D) In the case of an industrial insured captive insurance
company incorporated as a stock insurer, not less than three hundred thousand
dollars ($300,000) two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000);
(E) In the case of an association captive insurance
company incorporated as a mutual insurer, not less than seven hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($750,000) five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000);
(F) In the case of an industrial insured captive insurance
company incorporated as a mutual insurer, not less than five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000);
(G) In the case of a sponsored captive insurance company,
not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) one hundred
02/14/2025 7:48:10 AM ANS130

SB237
thousand dollars ($100,000); and
(H) In the case of a special purpose captive insurance
company, an amount determined by the commissioner after giving due
consideration to the company's business plan, feasibility study, and pro
formas, including the nature of the risks to be insured, but in no event less
than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) one hundred twenty-five
thousand dollars ($125,000).

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 23-63-1606 is amended to read as follows:
23-63-1606. Organization.
(a) A captive insurance company may be formed and operated in any form
of business organization authorized under Arkansas law and approved by the
Insurance Commissioner.
(b) The alien captive insurance company may register to do business in
this state after the commissioner's certificate has been issued.
(c) The capital stock of a captive insurance company incorporated as a
stock insurer must shall be issued at not less than par value.
(d) At least one (1) of the members of the board of directors of a
captive insurance company formed as a corporation in this state shall be a
resident of the United States or a United States territory.
(e) At least one (1) of the members of the subscribers' advisory
committee of a captive insurance company formed as a reciprocal insurer shall
be a resident of the United States or a United States territory.
(f)(1) A captive insurance company formed under this subchapter has
the privileges of and is subject to the business organization law of this
state and is subject to this subchapter.
(2) If a conflict occurs between business organization law and
this subchapter, the latter controls.
(3)(A) The Arkansas Insurance Code concerning mergers,
consolidations, and mutualizations, and redomestications applies in
determining the procedures to be followed by a captive insurance company in
carrying out any of those transactions.
(B) The commissioner may, upon request of an insurer that
is a party to a merger authorized under subdivision (f)(3)(A) of this
section, waive certain applicable requirements to the merger transaction.
(C) A conversion may be accomplished under a reasonable
02/14/2025 7:48:10 AM ANS130

SB237
plan and procedure as may be approved by the commissioner and according to
rules that the commissioner may promulgate.
(D) The commissioner may waive or modify the requirements
for public notice and hearing.
(E) If a notice of public hearing is required but no one
requests a hearing, the commissioner may cancel the hearing.
(F) An alien insurer may be a party to a merger authorized
under subdivision (f)(3)(A) of this section if the requirements for a merger
between a captive insurance company and a foreign insurer under this chapter
apply to the merger transaction.
(g)(1)(A) Notwithstanding any other method authorized by law, a
foreign or alien insurer may become a domestic captive insurance company by
complying with the requirements of this subchapter relative to the
organization and licensing of a domestic captive insurance company of the
same type with the approval of the commissioner.
(B) A foreign or alien insurer redomesticating to this
state under this section may be organized under any corporate form permitted
by this chapter.
(2)(A) A foreign or alien insurer that is domiciled in a foreign
or alien jurisdiction may redomesticate under this section if as a result of
the actions taken by the foreign or alien insurer under this section to
redomesticate to this state, the foreign or alien insurer shall no longer be
a domestic legal entity of the foreign or alien jurisdiction.
(B) A foreign or alien insurer that applies to
redomesticate under this section shall provide evidence to the commissioner
that the applicable regulatory authority of the foreign or alien jurisdiction
of its domicile has no objection to the redomestication.
(3)(A) The foreign or alien insurer applying to redomesticate
under this section shall:
(i) File with the Secretary of State its articles of
association, charter, or other organizational document, together with
appropriate amendments thereto adopted according to the laws of this state;
(ii) Bring the articles of association, charter, or
other organizational document into compliance with the laws of this state;
and
(iii) Obtain an approval letter issued by the
02/14/2025 7:48:10 AM ANS130

SB237
commissioner.
(B) The foreign or alien insurer may file with the
Secretary of State an election deferring the effective date of the
redomestication.
(C) Upon filing and paying any required fees, the
Secretary of State shall issue an acknowledgement letter to the applicant.
(4) The foreign or alien insurer shall file a copy of the
Secretary of State's acknowledgement letter with the commissioner, who shall
then issue a license under § 23-63-1602.
(5) Upon the completion of a redomestication under this section,
the captive insurance company shall be:
(A) Considered domiciled in this state;
(B) Subject to this subchapter; and
(C) Deemed to have a formation date corresponding to its
original formation date in the foreign or alien domicile.
(6) For the purposes of an examination under § 23-63-1608, an
examination conducted by the foreign or alien domicile that is substantially
similar to an examination conducted in this state if the company had been
domiciled in this state shall be recognized for the purposes of establishing
the period of time when the next examination is due.
(7) A foreign or alien insurer redomesticating under this
section:
(A) Shall:
(i) Be liable only for taxes due under § 23-63-1614
on premiums paid to the captive insurance company after redomestication; and
(ii)(a) Report all premium taxes due under § 23-63-
1614 but may elect to forego the payment of premium taxes, in either its
first or its second year of operations, but not both, after redomesticating
into this state.
(b) A foreign or alien insurer making an
election under subdivision (g)(7)(A)(ii)(a) of this section that surrenders
its license or redomesticates to another jurisdiction within five (5) years
of redomestication into this state shall immediately pay a tax in an amount
equal to the premium tax under § 23-63-1614 plus ten percent (10%) per annum
from the date the premium tax under § 23-63-1614 would have been due; and
(B) After July 1 of any year shall be subject to only one-
02/14/2025 7:48:10 AM ANS130

SB237
half (½) of the minimum premium tax specified under § 23-63-1614 in its first
year.
(8) This section shall not:
(A) Be the exclusive means of redomesticating a captive
insurance company to this state; and
(B) Restrict the ability of an insurance company to
undergo a merger, consolidation, transfer of assets and liabilities, or
utilize any other means permitted by law to effect the transfer of operations
of a foreign or alien insurance company to this state.
(h)(1)(A) A captive insurance company formed as a reciprocal insurer
under this subchapter is subject to § 23-70-101 et seq. and this subchapter.
(B) If a conflict occurs between § 23-70-101 et seq. and
this subchapter, the latter controls.
(C) To the extent a reciprocal insurer is made subject to
the Arkansas Insurance Code under § 23-70-101 et seq., the Arkansas Insurance
Code is not applicable to a reciprocal insurer formed under this subchapter
unless expressly made applicable to a captive insurance company by this
subchapter.
(2) In addition to subdivision (g)(1) subdivision (h)(1) of this
section, a captive insurance company organized as a reciprocal insurer that
is an industrial insured group is subject to § 23-70-101 et seq. and
applicable provisions of the Arkansas Insurance Code.
(h)(i) The articles of incorporation or bylaws of a captive insurance
company may authorize a quorum of a board of directors to consist of no fewer
than one-third (⅓) of the fixed or prescribed number of directors under § 4-
27-824(b).
(i)(j) The subscribers' agreement or other organizing document of a
captive insurance company formed as a reciprocal insurer may authorize a
quorum of a subscribers' advisory committee to consist of no fewer than one-
third (⅓) of the number of its members.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 23-63-1607(b)(2), concerning reporting
requirements of a captive insurance company, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(C) The commissioner may waive the requirement of an audit
or actuarial opinion for a pure captive insurance company if the parent of
02/14/2025 7:48:10 AM ANS130

SB237
the pure captive insurance company has:
(i) A consolidated audit;
(ii) A guaranty for liabilities of the pure captive
insurance company;
(iii) A minimum net equity of one hundred million
dollars ($100,000,000); and
(iv) A financial strength rating of "BBB" or better
from a rating agency acceptable to the commissioner.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 23-63-1608(a), concerning the examination
of a captive insurance company, is amended to add an additional subdivision
to read as follows:
(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1) of this section, a pure
captive insurance company shall be subject to examination:
(A) At least one (1) time every seven (7) years; or
(B) Whenever the commissioner determines it to be prudent.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 23-63-1614 is amended to read as follows:
23-63-1614. Premium tax — Definition.
(a) Except as provided in this section, a captive insurance company
shall pay to the Insurance Commissioner by March 1 of each year, a tax at the
rate of:
(1) Two hundred fifty thousandths of one percent (0.250%) on the
first twenty million dollars ($20,000,000);
(2) One hundred fifty thousandths of one percent (0.150%) on the
next twenty million dollars ($20,000,000); and
(3) Fifty thousandths of one percent (0.050%) on each dollar
thereafter, on the direct premiums collected or contracted for on policies or
contracts of insurance written by the captive insurance company during the
year ending December 31 next preceding, after deducting from the direct
premiums subject to the tax the amounts paid to policyholders as return
premiums, which shall include dividends on unabsorbed premiums or premium
deposits returned or credited to policyholders.
(b)(1) Except as provided in this section, a captive insurance company
shall pay to the commissioner by March 1 of each year, a tax at the rate of:
(A) Two hundred twenty-five thousandths of one percent
02/14/2025 7:48:10 AM ANS130

SB237
(0.225%) on the first twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) of assumed
reinsurance premium;
(B) One hundred fifty thousandths of one percent (0.150%)
on the next twenty million dollars ($20,000,000);
(C) Fifty thousandths of one percent (0.050%) on the next
twenty million dollars ($20,000,000); and
(D) Twenty-five thousandths of one percent (0.025%) of
each dollar thereafter.
(2) No reinsurance tax applies A reinsurance tax does not apply
to premiums for risks or portions of risks that are subject to taxation on a
direct basis under subsection (a) of this section.
(3) A premium tax is not payable in connection with the receipt
of assets in exchange for the assumption of loss reserves and other
liabilities of another insurer under common ownership and control, if the
transaction is part of a plan to discontinue the operations of the other
insurer and if the intent of the parties to the transaction is to renew or
maintain business with the captive insurance company.
(c) If the aggregate taxes to be paid by a captive insurance company
calculated under subsections (a) and (b) of this section amount to less than
five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any year, the captive insurance company
shall pay a tax of five thousand dollars ($5,000) for that year.
(d) The total tax paid by a captive insurance company shall not exceed
one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in any year.
(e)(1)(A) A captive insurance company may apply for a credit for the
noncommissioned salaries and wages of its Arkansas employees that are paid in
connection with its captive insurance company operations.
(B) The credit under subdivision (e)(1)(A) of this section
may be applied as an offset against the premium taxes imposed by this
section.
(2)(A) An employee shall be employed for six (6) months for the
salary or wages to be eligible to qualify for the premium tax credit under
subdivision (e)(1)(A) of this section.
(B) The employee shall:
(i) Have a primary residence in this state; and
(ii) Pay income taxes in this state.
(3) The offset under subdivision (e)(1)(B) of this section shall
02/14/2025 7:48:10 AM ANS130

SB237
not reduce the premium tax due by more than fifty percent (50%).
(f) A captive insurance company failing to make returns or to pay all
taxes required by this section is subject to relevant sanctions under the
Arkansas Insurance Code.
(f)(g) Two (2) or more captive insurance companies under common
ownership and control must shall be taxed as though they were a single
captive insurance company.
(g)(h) As used in this section, “common ownership and control” means:
(1) In the case of stock corporations, the direct or indirect
ownership of eighty percent (80%) or more of the outstanding voting stock of
two (2) or more corporations by the same shareholder or shareholders; and
(2) In the case of mutual corporations, the direct or indirect
ownership of eighty percent (80%) or more of the surplus and the voting power
of two (2) or more corporations by the same member or members.
(h)(i) In the case of a branch captive insurance company, the tax
under this section applies only to the branch business of the company.
(i)(1)(j)(1) The tax under this section constitutes all taxes
collectible under the laws of this state from a captive insurance company.
(2) No other tax may be levied or collected from a captive
insurance company by this state or a county, city, or municipality of this
state, except ad valorem taxes on real and personal property used in the
production of income.
(j)(k) This section shall not apply to any producer reinsurance
captive insurance company that invests and continuously maintains not less
than fifty percent (50%) of its assets in certificates of deposit of any bank
organized under the laws of the United States with a banking facility in the
State of Arkansas or any federally insured bank or savings institution
organized under the laws of the State of Arkansas, or in bonds, notes,
warrants, or other securities, not in default, that are direct obligations
of:
(1) This state;
(2) Any county, incorporated city or town, or duly organized
school district or other taxing district of this state:
(A) If no default on the part of the obligor in payment of
principal or interest on any of its obligations has occurred within five (5)
years prior to the date of the proposed investment; or
02/14/2025 7:48:10 AM ANS130

SB237
(B) If the obligations were issued less than five (5)
years prior to the date of investment, no default in payment of principal or
interest has occurred on the obligations to be purchased or on any other
public obligation of the obligor within five (5) years of the investment; or
(3) Any local improvement district in this state to finance
local improvements authorized by law, if the principal and interest of the
obligations are payable from assessments on real property within the local
improvement district, and:
(A) No default on the part of the obligor in payment of
principal or interest on any of its obligations has occurred within five (5)
years prior to the date of the proposed investment; or
(B) If the obligations were issued less than five (5)
years prior to the date of investment, no default in payment of principal or
interest has occurred on the obligations to be purchased or on any other
public obligation of the obligor within five (5) years of the investment.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 23-63-1624(c)(3), concerning the license
renewal fee of a dormant captive insurance company, is amended to read as
follows:
(3) Pay a license renewal fee as provided in the rules
promulgated by the commissioner under Section 18 of Rule and Regulation 73 of
the State Insurance Department.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 63, Subchapter 16, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-63-1625. Violations.
(a) The Insurance Commissioner, after notice and a hearing, shall
suspend or revoke a certificate of authority of a captive insurance company
if the commissioner finds that the captive insurance company:
(1)(A) Is in an unsound condition or is in such condition, or is
using methods and practices in the conduct of its business, as to allow
further transactions of insurance in Arkansas hazardous or injurious to the
policyholders of the captive insurance company or to the public.
(B) For purposes of this section, the commissioner may
consider the present, past, and future trends in the financial condition of
the captive insurance company that may affect the solvency of the captive
02/14/2025 7:48:10 AM ANS130

SB237
insurance company;
(2) Refuses to be examined or to produce the accounts, records,
or files of the captive insurance company for examination or if any of the
officers of the captive insurance company have refused to give information
with respect to the affairs of the captive insurance company when required by
the commissioner;
(3) Fails to pay any final judgment rendered against the captive
insurance company within thirty (30) days of entry of the judgment; or
(4) Knowingly, or with reckless disregard, violated or failed to
comply with the Arkansas Insurance Code or with any lawful rule or order of
the commissioner.
(b) If the commissioner finds that one (1) or more grounds exist for
the suspension or revocation of a certificate of authority of a captive
insurance company, the commissioner may:
(1) In lieu of suspension, impose upon the holder of the
certificate of authority an administrative penalty in the amount of five
thousand dollars ($5,000); or
(2) In lieu of revocation, impose upon the holder of the
certificate of authority an administrative penalty in the amount of ten
thousand dollars ($10,000).
















02/14/2025 7:48:10 AM ANS130